sl-SI: Disciplina vlečnih vodnih športov: Vodni park z vlečnico; Jet ski / vodni skuterji; Deskanje na kolenih (kneeboarding); Za več športov; Deskanje na vodi (wakeboarding); Smučanje na vodi; Drugo
da: Disciplin for trukket vandsport: Kabelpark; Jetski/PWC; Kneeboarding; Multisport; Wakeboarding; Vandski; Andet
th: กีฬาทางน้ำประเภทลากจูง: เคเบิลพาร์ค; เจ็ตสกี / PWC; นีบอร์ด; กีฬาหลายประเภท; เวคบอร์ด; สกีน้ำ; อื่นๆ
vi: Môn thể thao dưới nước kéo: Công viên cáp kéo; Lướt ván phản lực / Mô tô nước (PWC); Lướt ván quỳ; Đa môn thể thao; Lướt ván nhào lộn; Lướt ván nước; Khác
fi: Vesiurheilun vetolaji: Kaapelipuisto; Vesijetteily; Polvilautailu; Monilaji; Wakeboarding; Vesihiihto; Muu
el: Είδος θαλάσσιου σπορ με ρυμούλκηση: Cable park; Jet ski / PWC; Kneeboard; Πολλαπλών αθλημάτων; Wakeboard; Θαλάσσιο σκι; Άλλο
pl: Dyscyplina sportów wodnych holowanych: Wakepark; Skutery wodne; Kneeboarding; Wielosportowe; Wakeboarding; Narciarstwo wodne; Inne
hr-HR: Disciplina sporta na vodi s vučom: Žičara na vodi (cable park); Jet ski / plovila na vodi; Kneeboarding; Više sportova; Wakeboarding; Skijanje na vodi; Ostalo
pt-PT: Modalidade de desporto aquático rebocado: Cable park; Jet ski/mota de água; Kneeboard; Multidesportivo; Wakeboard; Esqui aquático; Outro
en: Towed water sport discipline: Cable park; Jet skiing / PWC; Kneeboarding; Multi-sport; Wakeboarding; Waterskiing; Other
hu: Vontatható vízi eszköz sportága: Kábelpálya; Jet ski / PWC; Térddeszkázás; Multisport; Wakeboard; Vízisízés; Egyéb
ko: 견인 수상 스포츠 종목: 케이블 파크; 제트스키/개인용 수상기구(PWC); 니보딩; 멀티 스포츠; 웨이크보딩; 수상스키; 기타
pt-BR: Esporte aquático rebocado disciplina: Cable park; Jet ski / PWC; Kneeboard; Poliesportivo; Wakeboard; Esqui aquático; Outros
nl: Gesleepte watersportdiscipline: Kabelpark; Jetskiën / waterscooter; Kneeboarden; Multisport; Wakeboarden; Waterskiën; Overige
sk-SK: Disciplína vlečného vodného športu: Káblový vlek; Vodné skútre (PWC); Kneeboarding; Multi-šport; Wakeboarding; Vodné lyžovanie; Iné
sv: Disciplin för bogserad vattensport: Kabelpark; Vattenskoter; Kneeboard; Multisport; Wakeboard; Vattenskidor; Övrigt
cs: Disciplína vlečného vodního sportu: Cable park (vlek); Vodní skútry (PWC); Kneeboarding; Multisport; Wakeboarding; Vodní lyžování; Jiné
lt-LT: Tempiamo vandens sporto disciplina: Vandenlenčių parkas; Vandens motociklai / PWC; Klūpomosios vandens lentos; Kelių sporto šakų; Vandenlenčių sportas; Vandens slidžių sportas; Kita
nb: Trukket vannsportsdisiplin: Kabelpark; Vannscooter / PWC; Knebrett; Multisport; Wakeboard; Vannski; Annet
ru: Дисциплина буксируемого водного спорта: Вейк-парк; Гидроциклы / PWC; Нибординг; Мультиспорт; Вейкбординг; Водные лыжи; Другое
bg-BG: Дисциплина при воден спорт с теглене: Кейбъл парк; Джет (PWC); Нийборд; Мултиспорт; Уейкборд; Водни ски; Друго
fr: Discipline de sport nautique tracté: Téléski nautique; Jet-ski/motomarine; Kneeboard; Multisport; Wakeboard; Ski nautique; Autre
zh-CN: 拖曳水上运动项目: 索道滑水; 摩托艇 / 个人水上摩托; 跪板滑水; 多项运动; 尾流滑水; 滑水; 其他
tr: Çekmeli su sporu disiplini: Kablolu su parkı; Jet ski / PWC; Diz kayağı (Kneeboard); Çoklu spor; Wakeboard; Su kayağı; Diğer
ro-RO: Disciplină de sporturi nautice tractate: Cable park; Jet ski / PWC; Kneeboarding; Multisport; Wakeboarding; Schi nautic; Altele
ja: 牽引式ウォータースポーツ種目: ケーブルパーク; ジェットスキー/PWC; ニーボード; マルチスポーツ; ウェイクボード; 水上スキー; その他
it: Disciplina sportiva acquatica trainata: Cable park; Moto d'acqua (PWC); Kneeboard; Multisport; Wakeboard; Sci nautico; Altro
es: Disciplina de deportes acuáticos remolcados: Cable park; Moto acuática/PWC; Kneeboard; Multideporte; Wakeboard; Esquí acuático; Otro
zh-TW: 拖曳水上運動項目: 纜繩公園; 水上摩托車 / 個人水上載具 (PWC); 跪板衝浪; 多重水上運動; 寬水波衝浪 (Wakeboarding); 滑水; 其他
de: Wassersportart: Wakepark; Jet-Ski / PWC; Kneeboarding; Multisport; Wakeboarding; Wasserski; Sonstige